Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1150.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 11, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-1502, to read: START_STATUTE25-1502. Judicial training; mandatory topics Each judge who is appointed to serve in the family court shall complete a minimum of forty hours of training in the discipline and recognition of all of the following: 1. Domestic violence. 2. Sexual assault. 3. Post-traumatic stress disorder. 4. Mental health conditions. END_STATUTE